District of Columbia statutes.
29-708.02

Judicial dissolution.

On application by a partner the Superior Court may order dissolution of a limited partnership if it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities and affairs of the limited partnership in conformity with the partnership agreement.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(9)(B), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-701.07, § 29-708.01, and § 29-708.10.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “activities”.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 802 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.